Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Databases

7.500.
Public access to electronic form of Kentucky Constitution, statutes, acts, and administrative regulations.

The Legislative Research Commission shall make available to the public in electronic form the following texts:

The Constitution of Kentucky;

The Kentucky Revised Statutes;

The Kentucky Acts; and

The administrative regulations comprising the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service and the Administrative Register of Kentucky.

The information identified in subsection (1) of this section shall be made available to the public by means of access by way of the largest nonproprietary, nonprofit cooperative public computer network. The information shall be made available in one (1) or more formats and by one (1) or more means in order to provide the greatest feasible access to the general public in this Commonwealth. Any person who accesses the information may access all or any part of the information. The information shall be made available in the shortest feasible time after the information is available to the Legislative Research Commission.

Any documentation that describes the electronic digital formats of the information identified in subsection (1) of this section and is available to the public shall be made available by means of access by way of the computer network specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Personal information concerning a person who accesses the information made available under this section may be maintained only for the purpose of providing service to the person.

No fee or other charge may be imposed by the Legislative Research Commission as a condition of accessing the information that is accessible by way of the computer network specified in subsection (2) of this section.

The information made available to the public under this section shall not be subject to the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

No action taken pursuant to this section shall be deemed to alter or relinquish any copyright or other proprietary interest or entitlement of the Commonwealth of Kentucky relating to any of the information made available under this section.

In addition to the access provided by this section, the Commission may also make available any of the information identified in subsection (1) of this section by any other means of access that would facilitate public access to the information under terms and conditions established by the Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 46, § 8, effective September 1, 1996.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Articles, “Kentucky Legal Research on the Internet”, 86 Ky. L.J. 971 (1997-98).

7.505.
Web site to provide public access to expenditure records of legislative branch — Monthly and weekly updates — Commission is sole custodian of information and records — Branches to share software and applications.

By January 1, 2012, the Legislative Research Commission shall provide public access to records relating to expenditures of the legislative branch of state government through display of the records on a Web site. The Web site shall provide:

Financial information of expenditures not exempt under the provisions of state or federal law, including:

The payee name;

The category or type of the expenditure;

A description of the reason for the expenditure, if available;

The expenditure amount; and

A link to the financial document, if the document is electronically available;

A searchable format;

Access to the current enacted Legislative Branch Budget; and

A link to the public access Web site displays of the executive and judicial branches of state government, and of the public institutions of higher education.

Information on the Web site shall be updated at least on a monthly basis. However, information on the Web site which is part of, or contained in, an electronic accounting system utilized by all branches of state government, such as the Enhanced Management Administrative Reporting System (EMARS), shall be updated on a weekly basis.

The Commission shall maintain exclusive control and be considered the sole custodian of all information and records generated by and through activity of the legislative branch of government, notwithstanding the situs of the information and records in another branch of government, and disclosure thereof shall only be by the Commission in accordance with applicable law.

In order to reduce Web site development costs and enhance public access and use of records viewed through Web sites as provided by this section and KRS

26A.260

and

42.032

, each branch of state government shall freely share with the other branches of state government the software, software developments, and all applications, data, and information within its control used for Web site design, appearance, content, and operation in compliance with, or in furtherance of, the purposes contemplated by this section and KRS

26A.260

and

42.032

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 105, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

7.510.
Legislative electronic information system to be established and maintained.

The Legislative Research Commission shall establish and maintain a legislative electronic information system that includes the status of bills and resolutions publicly active within the legislative process and related information, including sponsors, summaries, and committee referrals. Electronic access to this information shall be made available to all agencies of the Commonwealth, its political subdivisions, and to the public. The Legislative Research Commission shall impose such conditions and restrictions upon nonlegislative access as it determines necessary.

Interim committee information, including membership, meeting times, locales, agendas, and related information shall be a part of the legislative electronic information system. Electronic access to this information shall be as provided in subsection (1) above.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 46, § 9, effective September 1, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section and KRS

61.878

(1)(k) (now

61.878

(1)(
l
)) operate in tandem to preclude the release of the Kentucky Administrative Regulations to anyone other than agencies of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions; therefore, request for copy of an Administrative Regulation promulgated by the Kentucky State Board for Elementary and Secondary Education stored on diskette by publishing company was properly denied. OAG 93 ORD 142.

7.520.
Access fees — Agreement with Legislative Research Commission required prior to access.

For the services rendered in providing access to the legislative electronic information system, the Legislative Research Commission may charge and collect fees as it determines, which shall be a reasonable and sufficient proportion of the costs for maintaining the system and furnishing access. No fee shall be charged to legislative users, including individual legislators.

No person, organization, corporation, or other entity shall receive access to legislative computer information, nor receive related services including the copying of computerized information, without first applying to the Legislative Research Commission and entering into an agreement with the Legislative Research Commission to provide such access or services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 66, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

7.550.
Role of Legislative Research Commission in development of population data for redistricting — Computerized map — Review of precinct establishment orders and requests for exemption.

The Legislative Research Commission shall serve as the legislative department’s liaison with the United States Bureau of the Census for purposes of Kentucky’s participation in and receipt of census maps and data under programs implementing United States Public Law 94-171, relating to the development of population data for redistricting.

The Legislative Research Commission shall maintain and continuously update a computerized map of Kentucky containing census geography and election precinct boundaries.

The Legislative Research Commission shall review any proposed precinct establishment order and request for an exemption made under KRS

117.0552

to

117.0554

to determine the effect of the proposed order or exemption upon the Commonwealth’s participation in programs to implement United States Public Law 94-171. If the Commission determines that the proposed order or exemption would have an adverse effect upon the Commonwealth’s ability to participate in the programs, it shall so advise the State Board of Elections.

The Legislative Research Commission may direct its interim joint subcommittee of appropriate jurisdiction to perform or oversee the performance of the responsibilities assigned to the Commission by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 430, § 7, effective April 13, 1992.